Utah statutes.
35A-3-105.   Determination of eligibility and responsibility -- Information
from State Tax Commission.
(1)  The division may have access to relevant information contained in the
income tax returns of a client, applicant, or person who has a duty to support
a client in determining:
(a)  eligibility for public assistance;
(b)  payment responsibilities for institutional care; or
(c)  any other administrative purpose consistent with this chapter.
(2)  The information requested by the division shall be:
(a)  provided by the State Tax Commission on forms furnished by the division;
and
(b)  treated as a private record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government
Records Access and Management Act, by the division.
